Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 409.711 is amended to read:
409.711. (1) The Department of Human Services shall adopt by rule  a grant program to provide
funding for the purposes described in subsections (2) and (3) of  this section to culturally specific and
responsive organizations, tribal governments and under-resourced  rural community service organ-
izations.
(2) Grants must be used to help low-income residents of this state by:
(a) Providing education about federal earned income tax credits and other tax benefits available
to low-income individuals;
(b) Assisting residents in navigating tax systems; and
(c) Filing income tax returns.
(3) The grants must be used to:
(a) Strengthen the existing network of culturally specific and responsive  tax preparation or-
ganizations;
(b) Expand  organizational capacity in geographically diverse areas of this state to improve ac-
cess to tax navigation and tax preparation services;
(c) Improve the recruitment and retention of qualified tax preparers;
(d) Strengthen  the technology resources and training systems available to tax preparers and
volunteers; or
(e) Strengthen  taxpayer outreach, education and connections to communities by culturally spe-
cific and responsive tax navigation and preparation service providers.
(4) The department shall appoint a committee to advise the department in the adoption  of rules
for the program. The advisory committee must include one or more individuals who:
(a) Are low income.
(b) Are Black.
(c) Are Indigenous.
(d) Are people of color.
(e) Are non-English-speaking.
(f) Have a disability.
(g) Are 65 years of age or older.
Enrolled House Bill 3795 (HB 3795-B) Page 1
(5) The department shall submit  an annual report, in the manner provided in ORS
192.245, to the committees or  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to
human services on the grant program established under this section.
SECTION 2.  ORS 418.808 is amended to read:
418.808. As used in ORS 418.806 to 418.816, “critical incident” means an incident that  resulted
in the death of a child if the Department of Human Services reasonably believes the death was  the
result of child abuse and:
(1) The child was in the custody of the department at the time of death;
(2) The child, the child’s sibling or any other  child living in the household with the child was
the subject of a child protective services assessment  by the department within the 12 months pre-
ceding the fatality;
(3) The child, the child’s sibling or any other child living in  the household with the child had
a pending child welfare or adoption case with the  department within the 12 months preceding the
fatality; or
(4) The child, the child’s sibling or any other  child living in the household with the child was
the subject of a  report of  suspected abuse or neglect made to the department or a law enforcement
agency within the  12 months preceding the fatality, whether or not the report was closed at
screening without an investigation being commenced.
Passed by House April 14, 2025
Repassed by House June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3795 (HB 3795-B) Page 2